Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2424
City or village
clerk; prepare transcript; cost;
indigent appellant.

(1) Upon the request of the owner appealing a special assessment
and the payment by him or her of the estimated cost of preparation of the
transcript to the city or village clerk or such clerk's designee, the
city or village clerk shall cause a complete transcript of the proceedings
before such city or village to
be prepared. The cost of preparing the transcript shall be calculated in the
same manner as the calculation of the fee for a court reporter for the preparation
of a bill of exceptions as specified by rules of practice prescribed by the
Supreme Court. At such time as the completed transcript is provided to the
appellant, the appellant shall pay the amount of the cost of preparation which
is in excess of the estimated cost already paid or shall receive a refund
of any amount in excess of the actual cost. An appellant determined to be
indigent shall not be required to pay any costs associated with such transcript
preparation.

(2) For purposes of this
section, indigent means the inability to financially pursue the appeal without
prejudicing the appellant's ability to provide economic necessities for the
appellant or the appellant's family. Indigency shall be determined by the
court having jurisdiction over the appeal upon motion of the appellant. The
court shall make a reasonable inquiry to determine the appellant's financial
condition and shall consider such factors as the appellant's income, the availability
to the appellant of other resources, including real and personal property,
bank accounts, social security benefits, and unemployment or other benefits,
the appellant's normal living expenses, the appellant's outstanding debts,
the number and age of the appellant's dependents, and other relevant circumstances.

Laws 1975, LB 468, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB441, § 5.